Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.20.100

Duty to preserve statements and reports. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

The commission must preserve statements or reports required to be filed under this title for not less than 10 years.

[ 2024 c 164 s 416; 2010 c 205 s 9; 1973 c 1 s 45 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.150, 42.17.450.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.